en: Aluminium, aluminum
xx: 41 ALU, ALU 41, ALU, ALU41, 41ALU, aluminium
bg: Алуминий
ca: alumini
cs: hliník
da: aluminium
de: Aluminium
el: αργίλιο
es: aluminio
et: alumiinium
fi: alumiini
fr: Aluminium
ga: alúmanam
hr: aluminij
hu: Alumínium
it: Alluminio
ja: アルミ
lt: aliuminis
lv: alumīnijs
mt: aluminju
nl: Aluminium
nn: aluminium
pl: Aluminium, glin
pt: Alumínio
ro: aluminiu
ru: Алюминий
sk: hliník
sl: aluminij
sv: aluminium
tr: alüminyum
uk: алюміній
zh: 铝

en: Heavy aluminium, thick aluminium
bg: Тежък алуминий, дебел алуминий
ca: Alumini pesat, alumini gruixut
cs: Těžký hliník, tlustý hliník
da: Tung aluminium, tykt aluminium
de: Schweres Aluminium, dickes Aluminium
el: Βαρύ αργίλιο, παχύ αργίλιο
es: Aluminio grueso, Aluminio pesado
et: Raske alumiinium, paks alumiinium
fi: Paksu alumiini, raskas alumiini
fr: Aluminium lourd, aluminium épais
ga: Alúmanam trom, alúmanam crua
hr: Teški aluminij, debeli aluminij
hu: Nehéz alumínium, vastag alumínium
it: Alluminio spesso, Alluminio pesante
ja: 重いアルミニウム、厚いアルミニウム
lt: Sunkus aliuminis, storas aliuminis
lv: Smags alumīnijs, biezs alumīnijs
mt: Aluminju tqil, aluminju spiss
nl: Dik aluminium, Zwaar aluminium
nn: Tungt aluminium, tykt aluminium
pl: Grube aluminium, Ciężkie aluminium
pt: Alumínio pesado, alumínio grosso, alumínio rígido
ro: Aluminiu greu, aluminiu gros
ru: Тяжелый алюминий, толстый алюминий
sk: Ťažký hliník, hrubý hliník
sl: Težek aluminij, debel aluminij
sv: Tungt aluminium, tjockt aluminium
tr: Ağır alüminyum, kalın alüminyum
uk: Важкий алюміній, товстий алюміній
zh: 重铝, 厚铝

en: Light aluminium, thin aluminium
bg: Лек алуминий, тънък алуминий
ca: Alumini lleuger, alumini prim
cs: Lehký hliník, tenký hliník
da: Lette aluminium, tyndt aluminium
de: Leichtes Aluminium, dünnes Aluminium
el: Ελαφρύ αργίλιο, λεπτό αργίλιο
es: Papel de aluminio, hojas finas de aluminio, aluminio fino, papel albal
et: Kerge alumiinium, õhuke alumiinium
eu: Aluminio arina, aluminio tenka, aluminio txiki
fi: Kevyt alumiini, ohut alumiini
fr: Aluminium léger, aluminium fin
ga: Alúmanam éadrom, alúmanam tanaí
hr: Lagani aluminij, tanki aluminij
hu: Könnyű alumínium, vékony alumínium
is: Léttur alúminíum, þunnur alúminíum
it: Alluminio leggero, alluminio sottile
lt: Lengvas aliuminis, plonas aliuminis
lv: Viegls alumīnijs, plāns alumīnijs
mt: Aluminju ring, aluminju tan
nl: Dun aluminium
nn: Lett aluminium, tynn aluminium
pl: Cienkie aluminium, Lekkie aluminium
pt: Alumínio leve, alumínio fino, alumínio maleável
ro: Aluminiu ușor, aluminiu subțire
ru: Легкий алюминий, тонкий алюминий
sk: Ľahký hliník, tenký hliník
sl: Lahki aluminij, tanek aluminij
sv: Lätt aluminium, tunn aluminium
tr: Hafif alüminyum, ince alüminyum
uk: Легкий алюміній, тонкий алюміній
zh: 轻铝, 薄铝

en: aluminium foil, aluminum foil, tin foil
da: stanniol, alufolie, sølvpapir, tinfolie
eo: aluminifolio
fi: alumiinifolio
se: silbabábir
sv: aluminiumfolie

en: recycled aluminium
sv: återvunnen aluminium, 100% återvunnen aluminium

en: Wood, wooden
xx: 50 FOR, FOR 50
bg: Дървесина
ca: fusta
cs: dřevo
da: Træ
de: Holz
el: ξύλο
es: madera
et: puit
eu: zur
fi: puuaines
fr: Bois, Cellulosique / Bois, Cellulosique / Autre bois
ga: adhmad
hr: drvo
hu: Fa
is: Viður
it: Legno
lt: Mediena
lv: koksne
mk: дрво
mt: injam
nb: treverk
nl: Hout
nn: trevirke
pl: Drewno, drewniane
pt: Madeira
ro: lemn
ru: Древесина
sk: drevo
sl: les
sq: dru
sr: дрво
sv: trä
tr: tahta
uk: деревина

en: Cork
xx: 51 FOR, FOR 51
af: kurk
bg: Корк
ca: suro
co: sùvaru
cs: korek
da: Kork
de: Kork
eo: korko
es: corcho
fi: korkki
fo: tøppur
fr: Liège, Cellulosique / Liège
fy: koark
hr: pluto
hu: Parafa
id: gabus
io: korko
it: sughero
nl: Kurk
oc: siure
pl: Korek
pt: Cortiça
ru: Пробка
sv: kork
sw: kizibo

en: Textile, textiles
xx: 52 FOR, FOR 52
af: Tekstiel, tekstiele
ar: نسيج, أقمشة
az: Tekstil, tekstillər
be: Тэкстыль, тэкстылі
bg: Текстил, текстилни изделия
br: Tekstil, tekstilioù
ca: Tèxtil, tèxtils
cs: Textil, textilie
da: Tekstil, tekstiler
de: Textil, Textilien
el: Υφαντουργία, υφάσματα
eo: Tekstilaĵo, tekstilaĵoj
es: Textil, textiles
et: Tekstiil, tekstiilid
eu: Textila, textilak
fa: متن, پارچه‌ها
fi: Tekstiili, tekstiilit
fo: Tekstil, tekstil
fr: Textile, textiles, fibre textile, fibres textiles
fy: Tekstyl, tekstilen
he: טקסטיל, בדים
hr: Tekstil, tekstilni materijali
hu: Textil, textíliák
id: Tekstil, tekstil
io: Tekstilo, tekstili
it: Tessile, tessili
lt: Tekstilė, tekstilės
lv: Tekstils, tekstilizstrādājumi
mk: Текстил, текстилни материјали
mt: Tekstil, tekstili
nb: Tekstil, tekstiler
nl: Textiel
nn: Tekstil, tekstilar
oc: Textil, textiles
pl: Tekstylia, tekstylia
pt: Têxtil, têxteis
ro: Textil, textile
ru: Текстиль, текстильные изделия
sk: Textil, textílie
sl: Tekstil, tekstilni izdelki
sq: Tekstil, tekstilet
sr: Текстил, текстилни материјали
sv: Textil, textilier
sw: Kitambaa, vitambaa
tr: Tekstil, tekstil ürünleri
uk: Текстиль, текстильні вироби

en: Cotton
xx: 60 COT, COT 60, 60 TEX, TEX 60
af: katoen
ar: قطن
az: pambıq
be: бавоўнік
bg: Памук
br: koton
ca: cotó
cs: bavlna
da: Bomuld
de: Baumwolle
el: βαμβάκι
eo: kotono
es: algodón
et: puuvill
eu: algodoi
fa: پنبه
fi: puuvilla
fo: bummull
fr: Coton
fy: ketoen
he: כותנה
hr: pamuk
hu: Pamut
hy: բամբակենի
id: kapas
is: baðmull
it: Cotone
ja: 綿
ka: ბამბა
ko: 면화
lt: medvilnė
lv: kokvilna
mn: хөвөн
mt: qoton
nl: Katoen
no: bomull
pl: bawełna
pt: Algodão
ro: bumbac
ru: Хлопок
sk: bavlna
sl: bombaž
sq: pambuk
sr: памук
sv: bomull
th: ฝ้าย
tr: pamuk
uk: бавовна
vi: bông
zh: 棉花

en: Linen, flax
bg: Лен
de: Leinen, Flachs
es: Lino, fibra de lino
fr: Lin, Fibre - Textile / Lin
it: Lino, fibra di lino
nl: Linnen, vlas
pt: Linho, fibra de linho

en: 61 TEX Jute, Jute
xx: 61 TEX, TEX 61
bg: 61 TEX юта, юта
ca: 61 TEX jute, jute
cs: 61 TEX Juta, Juta
da: 61 TEX jute, jute
de: 61 TEX Jute, Jute
el: 61 TEX Γιούτα, Γιούτα
es: 61 TEX yute, yute
et: 61 TEX Džuut, Džuut
fi: 61 TEX Juutti, Juutti
fr: 61 TEX jute, jute
hr: 61 TEX juta, juta
hu: 61 TEX juta, juta
it: 61 TEX iuta, iuta
lt: 61 TEX Džiutas, Džiutas
lv: 61 TEX Džuta, Džuta
mk: 61 TEX јута, јута
nb: 61 TEX jute, jute
nl: 61 TEX jute, jute
nn: 61 TEX jute, jute
pl: 61 TEX juta, juta
pt: 61 TEX juta, juta
ro: 61 TEX Iută, Iută
ru: 61 TEX джут, джут
sk: 61 TEX Juta, Juta
sl: 61 TEX juti, juti
sr: 61 TEX jute, jute
sv: 61 TEX jute, jute
tr: 61 TEX Jüt, Jüt
uk: 61 TEX Джут, Джут

en: Other Textiles
xx: 62 TEX, TEX 62, 63 TEX, TEX 63, 64 TEX, TEX 64, 65 TEX, TEX 65, 66 TEX, TEX 66, 67 TEX, TEX 67, 68 TEX, TEX 68, 69 TEX, TEX 69
bg: Друг текстил
de: Andere Textilien
es: Otros textiles
fr: Autres textiles, autre textile, Fibre - Textile / Autre fibre végétale / cellulosique
hu: Egyéb textilek, Egyéb textil, Egyéb textília, Más textilek
it: Altri Tessili
nl: Ander textiel
pt: Outros têxteis
ro: Alte textile
ru: Другие текстильные изделия
sv: Andra textilier

en: Glass
bg: Стъкло
bs: Staklo
ca: vidre
cs: sklo
da: Glas
de: Glas
el: γυαλί
es: Vidrio, cristal
et: klaas
fi: lasi
fr: Verre, Silicates / Verre (sodo-calcique), Silicates / Verre autre que sodo-calcique (cristal - pyrex etc.), Silicates / Autre Silicates
ga: gloine
hr: staklo
hu: Üveg
is: Gler
it: Vetro
lt: Stiklas
lv: stikls
mk: стакло
mt: ħġieġ
nb: glass
nl: Glas, Glazen
nn: glas
pl: szkło
pt: vidro
ro: sticlă
ru: стекло
sk: sklo
sl: steklo
sq: xham
sr: стакло, staklo
sv: glas
tr: Cam
uk: скло

en: Clear Glass
xx: 70 GL, GL 70, 70GL, GL70, 70 GLS, GLS 70, 70GLS, GLS70
bg: Безцветно стъкло
da: Klar Glas
de: Klarglas, Farbloses Glas
es: Vidrio transparente
fr: Verre transparent
hr: bezbojno staklo
hu: Fehér üveg
it: Vetro trasparente
nl: transparant glas, transparant glazen
pl: Przezroczyste szkło, Przeźroczyste szkło
pt: Vidro transparente
sv: Klart glas
tr: Net cam
uk: Прозоре скло

en: Uncoloured Glass, Uncolored Glass
da: ufarvet glas
fr: Verre incolore
sv: ofärgat glas

en: Coloured Glass, Colored Glass
da: farvet glas
fr: Verre coloré
sv: färgat glas

en: Green Glass
xx: 71 GL, GL 71, 71GL, GL71, 71 GLS, GLS 71, 71GLS, GLS71
bg: Зелено стъкло
cs: Zelené sklo
da: Grønt Glas
de: Grünglas, Grünes Glas
es: Vidrio verde
et: roheline klaas
fi: vihreä lasi
fr: Verre vert
ga: glais glas
hr: zeleno staklo
hu: Zöld üveg
is: grænt gler
it: vetro verde
lt: žalias stiklas
lv: zaļš stikls
mk: зелено стакло
nb: grønt glass
nl: Groen glas, groene glazen
nn: grønt glas
pl: Zielone szkło
pt: Vidro verde
ro: sticlă verde
ru: зеленое стекло
sk: zelené sklo
sl: zeleno steklo
sq: xhami jeshil
sr: зелено стакло
sv: grönt glas
tr: Yeşil cam
uk: зелене скло

en: Brown Glass
xx: 72 GL, GL 72, 72GL, GL72, 72 GLS, GLS 72, 72GLS, GLS72
bg: Кафяво стъкло
cs: hnědé sklo
da: brunt glas
de: Braunglas, Braunes Glas
el: καφέ γυαλί
es: vidrio marrón
et: pruun klaas
fi: ruskea lasi
fr: Verre brun
ga: glais donn
hr: smeđe staklo
hu: barna üveg
is: brúnt gler
it: vetro marrone
lt: ruda stiklas
lv: brūns stikls
mk: кафеаво стакло
mt: ħġieġ braun
nb: brunt glass
nl: Bruin glas, bruine glazen
nn: brunt glas
pl: Brązowe szkło
pt: vidro marrom
ro: sticlă maro
ru: коричневое стекло
sk: hnedé sklo
sl: rjavo steklo
sq: xham kafe
sr: braon staklo
sv: brunt glas
tr: kahverengi cam
uk: коричневе скло

en: Dark Sort Glass
xx: 73 GL, GL 73, 73GL, GL73, 73 GLS, GLS 73, 73GLS, GLS73
de: Dunkles Sortierglas
es: Vidrio oscuro
fr: Verre sombre
hr: ostalih boja staklo
hu: Sötét válogatott üveg
it: Vetro scuro
nl: Donker glas, donkere glazen

en: Light Sort Glass
xx: 74 GL, GL 74, 74GL, GL74, 74 GLS, GLS 74, 74GLS, GLS74
de: Helles Sortierglas
es: Vidrio claro
fr: Verre clair
hu: Világos válogatott üveg
it: Vetro chiaro
nl: Lichtgekleurd glas